Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3008
Podiatry; license; qualifications.

Every applicant for an initial license to practice podiatry shall (1) present proof of graduation from a school of chiropody or podiatry approved by the board, (2) present proof of completion of a minimum one-year postgraduate residency program approved by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education of the American Podiatric Medical Association, (3) pass a written examination which consists of (a) parts I and II of the examination given by the National Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners and (b) the written examination approved by the Board of Podiatry, and (4) present proof satisfactory to the board that he or she, within two years immediately preceding the application for licensure, (a) has been in the active practice of the profession of podiatry under a license in another state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia for a period of one year, (b) has completed at least one year of a postgraduate residency program approved by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education of the American Podiatric Medical Association, or (c) has completed continuing competency in podiatry approved by the board.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 74, p. 473;

C.S.1929, § 71-1003;

R.S.1943, § 71-175;

Laws 1961, c. 337, § 10, p. 1055;

Laws 1967, c. 438, § 5, p. 1351;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 28;

Laws 1990, LB 1064, § 11;

Laws 1995, LB 173, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 61;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 33;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-175;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1030.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.